dictionaries/cs/index.aff
SFX A   zat         žte        [^áíu]zat
SFX A   ázat        až         ázat
SFX A   ázat        ažme       ázat
SFX A   ázat        ažte       ázat
SFX A   ízat        iž         ízat
SFX A   ízat        ižme       ízat
SFX A   ízat        ižte       ízat
SFX A   at          ej         uzat
SFX A   at          ejme       uzat
SFX A   at          ejte       uzat
SFX A   t           je         [yu]zat
SFX A   sat         šu         sat
SFX A   sat         šeš        sat
SFX A   sat         še         sat
SFX A   sat         šeme       sat
SFX A   sat         šete       sat
SFX A   sat         šou        sat
SFX A   sat         š          sat
SFX A   sat         šme        sat
SFX A   sat         šte        sat
SFX A   rat         eru        rat
SFX A   rat         ereš       rat
SFX A   rat         ere        rat
SFX A   rat         ereme      rat
SFX A   rat         erete      rat
SFX A   rat         erou       rat
SFX A   rat         er         rat
SFX A   rat         erme       rat
SFX A   rat         erte       rat
SFX A   akat        áču        akat
SFX A   akat        áčeš       akat
SFX A   akat        áče        akat
SFX A   akat        áčeme      akat
SFX A   akat        áčete      akat
SFX A   akat        áčou       akat
SFX A   akat        ač         akat
SFX A   akat        ačme       akat
SFX A   akat        ačte       akat
SFX A   kat         ču         [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         češ        [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         če         [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         čeme       [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         čete       [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         čou        [^a]kat
SFX A   at          ej         kat
SFX A   at          ejme       kat
SFX A   at          ejte       kat
SFX A   at          u          [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          eš         [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          e          [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          eme        [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          ete        [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          ou         [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          0          [aeiyě][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          me         [aeiyě][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          te         [aeiyě][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          0          [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   at          me         [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   at          te         [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   at          i          [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ěme        [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ěte        [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   t           ň          stat
SFX A   t           ňme        stat
SFX A   t           ňte        stat
SFX A   at          ej         [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ejme       [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ejte       [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ej         [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          ejme       [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          ejte       [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          i          šlat
SFX A   t           l          [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           la         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           lo         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           li         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           ly         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   it          ím         it
SFX A   it          íš         it
SFX A   it          í          it
SFX A   it          íme        it
SFX A   it          íte        it
SFX A   it          0          [^o]učit
SFX A   it          me         [^o]učit
SFX A   it          te         [^o]učit
SFX A   oubit       ub         oubit
SFX A   oubit       ubme       oubit
SFX A   oubit       ubte       oubit
SFX A   oučit       uč         oučit
SFX A   oučit       učme       oučit
SFX A   oučit       učte       oučit
SFX A   dit         ď          [^o]udit
SFX A   dit         ďme        [^o]udit
SFX A   dit         ďte        [^o]udit
SFX A   oudit       uď         oudit
SFX A   oudit       uďme       oudit
SFX A   oudit       uďte       oudit
SFX A   t           0          [lr]oudit
SFX A   it          ěme        [lr]oudit
SFX A   it          ěte        [lr]oudit
SFX A   oulit       ul         oulit
SFX A   oulit       ulme       oulit
SFX A   oulit       ulte       oulit
SFX A   ounit       ouni       ounit
SFX A   ounit       ouněme     ounit
SFX A   ounit       ouněte     ounit
SFX A   oupit       up         oupit
SFX A   oupit       upme       oupit
SFX A   oupit       upte       oupit
SFX A   ouřit       uř         ouřit
SFX A   ouřit       uřme       ouřit
SFX A   ouřit       uřte       ouřit
SFX A   ousit       us         ousit
SFX A   ousit       usme       ousit
SFX A   ousit       uste       ousit
SFX A   outit       uť         outit
SFX A   outit       uťme       outit
SFX A   outit       uťte       outit
SFX A   tit         ť          [^o]utit
SFX A   tit         ťme        [^o]utit
SFX A   tit         ťte        [^o]utit
SFX A   oužit       už         oužit
SFX A   oužit       užme       oužit
SFX A   oužit       užte       oužit
SFX A   t           0          soužit
SFX A   it          eme        soužit
SFX A   it          ete        soužit
SFX A   ůlit        ul         ůlit
SFX A   ůlit        ulme       ůlit
SFX A   ůlit        ulte       ůlit
SFX A   úžit        už         úžit
SFX A   úžit        užme       úžit
SFX A   úžit        užte       úžit
SFX A   it          0          [aeioyě][bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A   it          me         [aeioyě][bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A   it          te         [aeioyě][bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A   t           0          [^aeiouyáéíóúůýěr][cčjlřsšzž]it
SFX A   it          eme        [^aeiouyáéíóúůýěr][cčjlřsšzž]it
SFX A   it          ete        [^aeiouyáéíóúůýěr][cčjlřsšzž]it
SFX A   t           0          [^aeiouyáéíóúůýě][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          ěme        [^aeiouyáéíóúůýě][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          ěte        [^aeiouyáéíóúůýě][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          0          r[bm]it
SFX A   it          me         r[bm]it
SFX A   it          te         r[bm]it
SFX A   it          0          [^o]u[bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A   it          me         [^o]u[bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A   it          te         [^o]u[bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A   t           0          třit
SFX A   it          eme        třit
SFX A   it          ete        třit
SFX A   it          0          [aeiouyáéíóúůýě]třit
SFX A   it          me         [aeiouyáéíóúůýě]třit
SFX A   it          te         [aeiouyáéíóúůýě]třit
SFX A   t           0          [^aeioyěáéíóúůýl]lit
SFX A   it          eme        [^aeioyěáéíóúůýl]lit
SFX A   it          ete        [^aeioyěáéíóúůýl]lit
SFX A   ábit        ab         ábit
SFX A   ábit        abme       ábit
SFX A   ábit        abte       ábit
SFX A   t           0          dčit
SFX A   it          eme        dčit
SFX A   it          ete        dčit
SFX A   áčit        ač         áčit
SFX A   áčit        ačme       áčit
SFX A   áčit        ačte       áčit
SFX A   ájit        aj         ájit
SFX A   ájit        ajme       ájit
SFX A   ájit        ajte       ájit
SFX A   álit        al         álit
SFX A   álit        alme       álit
SFX A   álit        alte       álit
SFX A   ámit        am         ámit
SFX A   ámit        amme       ámit
SFX A   ámit        amte       ámit
SFX A   ápit        ap         ápit
SFX A   ápit        apme       ápit
SFX A   ápit        apte       ápit
SFX A   ářit        ař         ářit
SFX A   ářit        ařme       ářit
SFX A   ářit        ařte       ářit
SFX A   ásit        as         ásit
SFX A   ásit        asme       ásit
SFX A   ásit        aste       ásit
SFX A   ášit        aš         ášit
SFX A   ášit        ašme       ášit
SFX A   ášit        ašte       ášit
SFX A   ávit        av         ávit
SFX A   ávit        avme       ávit
SFX A   ávit        avte       ávit
SFX A   ážit        až         ážit
SFX A   ážit        ažme       ážit
SFX A   ážit        ažte       ážit
SFX A   éčit        eč         éčit
SFX A   éčit        ečme       éčit
SFX A   éčit        ečte       éčit
SFX A   íbit        ib         íbit
SFX A   íbit        ibme       íbit
SFX A   íbit        ibte       íbit
SFX A   íčit        ič         íčit
SFX A   íčit        ičme       íčit
SFX A   íčit        ičte       íčit
SFX A   íjit        ij         íjit
