dictionaries/cs/index.dic
aktivizovat/ATN
aplaudovat/ATN
bacit/AN
blahoslavit/ATN
bortit/ACN
bubřet/AJTN
celovat/ATN
chroptět/ATN
civilizovat/ATN
cívkovat/ATN
dekantovat/ATN
denacizovat/ATN
devastovat/ATN
distancovat/ATN
doblízat/AJTN
dochroptět/ATN
dodrnčet/AN
dofotografovat/ATN
dohorlit/AN
dojarovizovat/ATN
dokomponovat/ATN
dokrystalovat/ATN
dolaminovat/ATN
dolíčit/ATN
domyslit/ACN
doostřit/ATN
doplodit/ACN
doprovodit/ACN
dorašit/ATN
doschůzovat/AN
dosolit/ATN
dostříknout/ATN
dotečkovat/ATN
dotápat/AJN
dovojákovat/AN
dověšet/AJTN
dočepýřit/ATN
doškrábnout/ATN
dožhavit/ATN
drápnout/ATN
dřepět/AN
etablovat/ATN
faktorovat/ATN
flambovat/ATN
fundovat/ATN
grilovat/ATN
helfnout/AN
hodovat/AN
hranit/AN
hutnět/ATN
ignorovat/ATN
inicializovat/ATN
intervenovat/AN
jiskřit/AN
kanout/AN
klasifikovat/ATN
klučit/ATN
kolportovat/ATN
konformovat/ATN
koordinovat/ATN
kouřit/ATN
kroutit/ACN
kupírovat/ATN
kázat/ATN
lajdačit/AN
letovat/ATN
lopotit/AN
líznout/ATN
maximalizovat/ATN
mixovat/ATN
mrazit/ATN
mámit/ATN
nabořit/ATN
nacvičovat/ATN
nadrbat/AJTN
naemailovat/ATN
nahradit/ACN
nakašírovat/ATN
nakoupit/ATN
nakynout/ATN
nalopotit/AN
namodelovat/ATN
naotravovat/AN
napodobovat/ATN
napumpovat/ATN
narámusit/AN
nasměrovat/ATN
nastřelit/ATN
natlačit/ATN
naveslovat/AN
navézt/ATN
načít/ATN
našponovat/ATN
nesrat/Aw
nýtovat/ATN
obhospodařovat/ATN
oblehnout/ACN
obnovit/ATN
obsrat/ATNw
obydlit/AN
ochořet/AJN
odblanit/ATN
odcizit/ATN
odestoupit/ATXN
odhlučnit/ATN
odjišťovat/ATN
odkousat/AJTN
odlakovat/ATN
odléčit/ATN
odmršťovat/ATN
odpeckovat/ATN
odpohlavnit/ATN
odpískovat/ATN
odseknout/ATN
odstrkovat/ATN
odtajňovat/ATN
oduševnit/ATN
odvzdušit/ATN
odúřadovat/ATN
odšlapovat/AN
ohlazovat/ATN
ojínit/ATN
oktrojovat/ATN
omastit/ACN
opadnout/AN
oploštit/ATN
oprašovat/ATN
orodovat/AN
oslnit/ATN
osušovat/ATN
otlouct/ATN
ověnčit/ATN
ozářit/ATN
oškrábnout/ATN
paktovat/AN
pastovat/ATN
pečetit/ATN
plivnout/ATN
pobrat/ATXN
podcenit/ATN
podkopat/AJTN
podpalovat/ATN
podstrojovat/ATN
podědit/ATN
pohltit/ACN
pointovat/ATN
pokračovat/ATN
polenošit/AN
pomaďarštit/ATN
ponocovat/AN
popisovat/ATN
popálit/ATN
posilovat/ATN
postrkovat/ATN
potencovat/ATN
pouvažovat/ATN
povyšovat/ATN
pozobracet/AJTN
pošoupnout/ATN
preludovat/ATN
prochodit/ACN
profanovat/ATN
prohovořovat/ATN
proklešťovat/ATN
prokrvácet/AJTN
prolézt/ATN
proměnit/ATXN
proplížit/AN
proseknout/ATN
prostudovat/ATN
protivit/AN
provlhnout/ATN
pročesat/AJTN
proštepovat/ATN
pulsovat/AN
písmenkovat/ATN
přecenit/ATN
předhodit/ACN
předmrazit/ATN
předskakovat/AN
předvařit/ATN
přefičet/AN
přehrabat/AJTN
překlonit/ATN
překroužit/AN
přelaminovat/ATN
přemapovat/ATN
přenáhlit/ATN
přeplátovat/ATN
přepůlit/ATN
přeslazovat/ATN
přesublimovat/ATN
přetransferovat/ATN
převařovat/ATN
převěsit/ACN
přeředit/ATN
přešumět/AN
přichytnout/ATN
přikročit/ATN
přiostřovat/ATN
přiskočit/AN
přitížit/ATN
přiřknout/ACTN
realizovat/ATN
reparovat/ATN
roubit/ATN
rozdělovat/ATN
rozhraničovat/ATN
rozkřepčit/ATN
rozmést/ATN
rozpracovat/ATN
rozsvěcet/AJN
rozvodnit/ATN
rozšifrovat/ATN
rýhovat/ATN
seběhnout/ATN
setřepat/AJTN
shoblovat/ATN
skopat/AJTN
slzet/AJN
snížit/ATN
spokojovat/AN
srazit/ACXN
strčit/ATN
svařit/ATN
sčutnout/ATN
tmavnout/AN
tulit/AN
ucedit/ACN
uhryzat/AJTN
ukřičet/ATN
uniknout/AN
upříst/ATN
usrat/ATNw
utvářet/AJTN
učesat/AJTN
vbodnout/ATN
vkloubit/ATN
vnést/ATN
vstřelovat/ATN
vybrouknout/ATN
vydlužovat/ATN
vyhecovat/ATN
vyjednocovat/ATN
vykreslovat/ATN
vylouhovat/ATN
vymísit/ACTN
vyploužit/AN
vypustit/ACN
vyslechnout/ATN
vystěžovat/AN
vytrousit/ACN
vyvraždit/ATN
vyčasit/ATN
vyšplíchnout/ATN
vzpružit/ATN
všumět/AN
zabušit/ATN
zadrhnout/ATN
zahlušit/ATN
zajizvit/ATN
zakrojovat/ATN
zalergizovat/ATN
zamrznout/ATN
zapilovat/ATN
zapřahovat/ATN
zasluhovat/ATN
zasytit/ACN
zatřpytit/AN
zavézt/ATN
zařídit/ACN
zažehovat/ATN
zchvátit/ACN
zdusit/ACN
zezlátnout/AN
zhroutit/ACN
zkadeřit/ATN
zkoulovat/ATN
zlidštit/ATN
zmonopolizovat/ATN
znepokojit/ATN
znovuustavit/ATN
zotročit/ATN
zpracovat/ATN
způsobovat/ATN
ztišit/ATN
zveličovat/ATN
zákrutovat/ATN
účtovat/ATN
řídnout/AN
šmelit/ATN
šílet/AJN
